Washington statutes.
RCW 11.135.040

Principles of law and equity apply.

The law of this state and principles of equity applicable to a nontestamentary estate planning document apply to an electronic nontestamentary estate planning document except as modified by this chapter.

[ 2024 c 188 s 5.]